dicts/dsb/dsb.dic
dowjasć/4
mjasć/4
plasć/4
pśemjasć/4
pśeplasć/4
pśewjasć/4
pśiwjasć/4
splasć/4
wjasć/4
wobplasć/4
wobwjasć/4
womjasć/4
wótmjasć/4
wótwjasć/4
wumjasć/4
wuplasć/4
wuwjasć/4
zaplasć/4
zawjasć/4
zmjasć/4
zwjasć/4
